Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB6146.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 352. (1) When If the annual growth rate is more than 2%, the percentage excess over 2% shall must be multiplied by the total state general fund-general purpose revenue for the fiscal year ending in the current calendar year to determine the amount to be transferred to the fund from the state general fund in the fiscal year beginning in the current calendar year. (2) Except as otherwise provided in section 358, the legislature shall not appropriate money from the fund for a fiscal year when if the annual growth rate for the calendar year in which that fiscal year ends is estimated to be greater than 0% at the most recent consensus revenue estimating conference. When If the annual growth rate is estimated to be less than 0% at the most recent consensus revenue estimating conference, the legislature may appropriate by law for the fiscal year ending in the current calendar year no more than 25% of the prior fiscal year ending balance in the fund as reported in the comprehensive annual financial report. However, if the annual growth rate is estimated to be less than 0% in consecutive calendar years, for each of the fiscal years ending in those calendar years, the legislature may appropriate by law no more than 25% of the available fund balance at the beginning of the first fiscal year ending in the first calendar year that had an annual growth rate less than 0%. (3) The legislature shall provide for transfers into or out of the fund through an appropriations act. (4) This section is subject to section 8 of the motor fuel tax act, 2000 PA 403, MCL 2007.1008. Enacting section 1. This amendatory act does not take effect unless House Bill No. 6147 (request no. H07245'26) of the 103rd Legislature is enacted into law.